Alaska statutes. Title 3. Agriculture, Animals, and Food.
Chapter 55. Care of Animals; Control of Dogs.

Collateral references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d, Animals, §§ 4, 19-22, 51-53, 67 et seq.

3B C.J.S., Animals, §§ 3-5, 12-20, 332-373, 392, 431-446.

Civil liability of landowner for killing or injuring trespassing dog. 15 ALR2d 578.

Liability of owner or operator of place of public resort for injury to patron by dog harbored by him. 17 ALR2d 459; 64 ALR4th 963.

Validity of statute or ordinance providing for destruction of dogs. 56 ALR2d 1024.

Liability for injuring or killing dog to protect cat. 73 ALR2d 1039; 8 ALR4th 1287; 55 ALR4th 1080; 68 ALR4th 823.

Liability for injury inflicted by horse, dog, or other domestic animal exhibited at show. 80 ALR2d 886.

Amount of damages for killing or injuring dog. 1 ALR3d 1022.

Keeping of dogs as enjoinable nuisance. 11 ALR3d 1399.

Liability of owner of dog known by him to be vicious for injuries to trespasser. 64 ALR3d 1039.

Animals as attractive nuisance. 64 ALR3d 1069.

Personal injuries inflicted by animal as within homeowner’s or personal liability policy. 96 ALR3d 891.

Construction and application of ordinances relating to unrestrained dogs, cats, or other domesticated animals. 1 ALR4th 994.

Liability of owner of dog for dog’s biting veterinarian or veterinarian’s employee. 4 ALR4th 349.

Intentional provocation, contributory or comparative negligence, or assumption of risk as defense to action for injury by dog. 11 ALR4th 127.

Dog owner’s liability for injuries sustained by person frightened by dog. 30 ALR4th 986.

Liability to adult social guest injured otherwise than by condition of premises. 38 ALR4th 200.

Absolute or strict liability for dog bite. 51 ALR4th 446.

Validity and construction of statute, ordinance, or regulation applying to specific dog breeds, such as pit bulls or bull terriers. 80 ALR4th 70.

Landlord’s liability to third person for injury resulting from attack on leased premises by dangerous or vicious animal kept by tenant. 87 ALR4th 1004.

Contributory negligence, assumption of risk, or intentional provocation as defense to action for injury by dog. 11 ALR5th 127.